California, session 20252026, AB1541.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 13012.9 of the Penal Code is amended to read:13012.9. (a) The information published on the OpenJustice Web portal pursuant to Section 13010 shall include information concerning arrests for violations of Section 236.1 and the number of individuals reported as a victim of human trafficking, as defined in Section 236.1, through the California Incident-Based Reporting System. System and the state summary criminal history information maintained by the Department of Justice.(b) The information required by subdivision (a) shall include all of the following:(1) The number of individuals arrested for violations of subdivision (a) of Section 236.1.(2) The number of individuals arrested for violations of subdivision (b) of Section 236.1.(3) The number of individuals arrested for violations of subdivision (c) of Section 236.1.(4) The number of convictions individuals convicted for violations of subdivisions subdivision (a) to (c), inclusive, of Section 236.1.(5) The number of individuals convicted for violations of subdivision (b) of Section 236.1.(6) The number of individuals convicted for violations of subdivision (c) of Section 236.1. (5)(7) The number of reported victims of human trafficking as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 236.1.(6)(8) The number of reported victims of human trafficking as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 236.1.(7)(9) The number of reported victims of human trafficking as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 236.1.SEC. 2. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.